src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
# Noun inflection
Meadow Mari noun inflection

## a final lexica

Some Postpositions in Mari take possessive suffixes. For now, am allowing all an all, but
we should revisit this in the lexicon eventually - classifying postpositions into those that
take Px and those that do not.

Also here: some adverbs that take possessive suffixes, like ӱстембалне *on the table* > ӱстембалнем *on my table*

* LEXICON N_   redirects to N-ava_01

* LEXICON N-continuation   comes from Proper nouns

* LEXICON N-ava_01  obl because of pronouns

* LEXICON   N-ava_01_obl  to obl only
* LEXICON   N-ava_01_obl_without-hyphens  to obl only

* LEXICON   N-ava_01_obl_with-hyphens  to obl only, also ООО-влак

* LEXICON N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  

DECLENSION 

### Case suffixes
Each case-number-person has its own lexicon.

* LEXICON N-SG-NOM  

* LEXICON N-SG-GEN 

* LEXICON N-SG-DAT 

* LEXICON N-SG-ACC 

* LEXICON N-SG-CMPR 

* LEXICON N-SG-COM 

* LEXICON N-SG-INE 

* LEXICON N-SG-ILL 

* LEXICON N-SG-LAT 

* LEXICON N-SG-ABE 

* LEXICON N-LOCPL-ILL 

* LEXICON N-LOCPL-INE 

* LEXICON N-LOCPL-LAT 

* LEXICON N-LOCPL-NOM  

* LEXICON N-PL-NOM 

* LEXICON N-PL-GEN 

* LEXICON N-PL-DAT 

* LEXICON N-PL-ACC 

* LEXICON N-PL-CMPR 

* LEXICON N-PL-COM 

* LEXICON N-PL-INE 

* LEXICON N-PL-ILL 

* LEXICON N-PL-LAT 

* LEXICON N-PL-ABE 

### Sg Sg1
Here starts the Px stuff

* LEXICON N-SG-PxSg1-NOM 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxSg1-GEN 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxSg1-DAT 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxSg1-ACC 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxSg1-CMPR 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxSg1-COM 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxSg1-INE 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxSg1-ILL 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxSg1-LAT 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxSg1-ABE 

### Pl Sg1
* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg1-NOM 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg1-NOM_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg1-GEN 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg1-GEN_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg1-DAT 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg1-DAT_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg1-ACC 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg1-ACC_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg1-CMPR  

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg1-CMPR_NB-first  

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg1-COM 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg1-COM_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg1-INE 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg1-INE_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg1-ILL 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg1-ILL_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg1-LAT 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg1-LAT_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg1-ABE 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg1-ABE_NB-first 

### Sg Sg2
* LEXICON N-SG-PxSg2-NOM 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxSg2-GEN 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxSg2-DAT 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxSg2-ACC 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxSg2-CMPR 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxSg2-COM 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxSg2-INE 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxSg2-ILL 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxSg2-LAT 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxSg2-ABE 

### Pl Sg2
* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg2-NOM 
* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg2-NOM_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg2-GEN 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg2-GEN_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg2-DAT 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg2-DAT_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg2-ACC 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg2-ACC_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg2-CMPR 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg2-CMPR_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg2-COM 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg2-COM_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg2-INE 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg2-INE_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg2-ILL 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg2-ILL_NB-first 

### Sg Sg3
* LEXICON N-SG-PxSg3-NOM 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxSg3-GEN 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxSg3-DAT 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxSg3-ACC 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxSg3-CMPR 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxSg3-COM 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxSg3-INE 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxSg3-ILL 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxSg3-LAT 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxSg3-ABE 

### Pl Sg3
* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg3-NOM 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg3-NOM_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg3-GEN 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg3-GEN_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg3-DAT 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg3-DAT_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg3-ACC 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg3-ACC_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg3-CMPR 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg3-CMPR_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg3-COM 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg3-COM_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg3-INE 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg3-INE_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg3-ILL 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg3-ILL_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg3-LAT 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg3-LAT_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg3-ABE 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxSg3-ABE_NB-first 

### Sg Pl1
* LEXICON N-SG-PxPl1-NOM 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxPl1-GEN 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxPl1-DAT 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxPl1-ACC 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxPl1-CMPR 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxPl1-COM 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxPl1-INE 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxPl1-ILL 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxPl1-LAT 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxPl1-ABE 

### Pl Pl1
* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl1-NOM 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl1-NOM_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl1-GEN 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl1-GEN_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl1-DAT 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl1-DAT_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl1-ACC 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl1-ACC_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl1-CMPR 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl1-CMPR_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl1-COM 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl1-COM_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl1-INE 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl1-INE_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl1-ILL 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl1-ILL_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl1-LAT 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl1-LAT_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl1-ABE 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl1-ABE_NB-first 

### Sg Pl2
* LEXICON N-SG-PxPl2-NOM 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxPl2-GEN 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxPl2-DAT 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxPl2-ACC 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxPl2-CMPR 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxPl2-COM 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxPl2-INE 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxPl2-LAT 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxPl2-ABE 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl2-NOM 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl2-NOM_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl2-GEN 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl2-GEN_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl2-DAT 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl2-DAT_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl2-ACC 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl2-ACC_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl2-CMPR 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl2-CMPR_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl2-COM 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl2-COM_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl2-INE 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl2-INE_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl2-ILL 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl2-ILL_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl2-LAT 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl2-LAT_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl2-ABE 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl2-ABE_NB-first 

### Sg Pl3
* LEXICON N-SG-PxPl3-NOM 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxPl3-GEN 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxPl3-DAT 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxPl3-ACC 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxPl3-CMPR 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxPl3-COM 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxPl3-INE 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxPl3-ILL 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxPl3-LAT 

* LEXICON N-SG-PxPl3-ABE 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl3-NOM 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl3-NOM_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl3-GEN 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl3-GEN_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl3-DAT 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl3-DAT_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl3-ACC 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl3-ACC_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl3-CMPR 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl3-CMPR_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl3-COM 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl3-COM_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl3-INE 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl3-INE_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl3-ILL 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl3-ILL_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl3-LAT 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl3-LAT_NB-first 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl3-ABE 

* LEXICON N-PL-PxPl3-ABE_NB-first 

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-mhr/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc)</small>

---
